Connecticut, session 2026, SB00222.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (f) of section 10-221a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(f) (1) Any student who presents a certificate from a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse stating that, in
the opinion of the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse, participation in physical education is medically
contraindicated because of the physical condition of such student, shall
be excused from the physical education requirement, provided the
credit for physical education may be fulfilled by an elective.
(2) Any student who participates in interscholastic athletics may be
exempt from the physical education and wellness requirement under
subdivision (3) of subsection (d) of this section, provided such
exemption is permitted pursuant to a policy adopted by the local or
regional board of education of the school district in which such student
is enrolled. Any student who receives such exemption shall still be
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 222
responsible for completing a minimum of twenty-five credits in order to
graduate from high school or be granted a diploma under this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-221a(f)
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2